Vermont statutes. Title 31 Recreation and Sports
Chapter 11. Municipal Regulation of Dance Halls, Bowling Alleys, Pool Halls, and Coasting

§ 501.
Dance hall defined.

A room, hall, eating place, building, structure, or place shall be deemed to be a dance hall for the purposes of this chapter at all times and occasions when dancing, for which admission is charged and which is open to the general public, is conducted or permitted therein.

§ 502.
Supervision.

A person, partnership, association, or corporation shall not operate a dance hall unless, at the hours when dancing is conducted or permitted therein, there is in attendance one or more police or other officers empowered to make arrests.
With the approval of the selectboard, city council, or trustees of the town, city, or incorporated village where the dance hall is operated, licensed security guards may be employed in place of officers.
The officers or security guards shall be paid for their services by the operator of the dance hall.
The number of officers or security guards and the individuals so acting shall be approved by the selectboard, mayor, or trustees of the town, city, or incorporated village.

HISTORY:

Amended

1991, No. 69

, § 2, eff. June 21, 1991.

§ 503.
License required.

A person, partnership, association, or corporation shall not operate a dance hall, bowling alley, or pool hall unless a license so to do has been obtained from the selectboard, city council, or trustees of the town, city, or incorporated village in which it is proposed to operate such dance hall, bowling alley, or pool hall.
Any such license may, after hearing and for cause, be revoked by the municipal officers granting the same when in their judgment the public good requires.

§ 504.
Fees and regulations.

The selectboard, city council, or trustees of a town, city, or incorporated village shall grant a license as provided in section 503 of this title upon application therefor and upon compliance by the applicant with such reasonable requirements as they may prescribe for the protection and safety of the public and the preservation of the public morals and upon payment of such fee as they may require, not to exceed $25.00 in case of an annual fee or $5.00 in case of a single dance.

§ 505.
Regulations on operation.

The selectboard, city council, or trustees of a town, city, or incorporated village are hereby empowered to make regulations concerning the operation of dance halls, bowling alleys, and pool halls including lighting, both inside and outside, on the premises where such dance halls, bowling alleys, or pool halls are operated.
Such rules and regulations shall not be effective until they are recorded in the office of the clerk of the municipality for which the same are made, and no license shall be issued until such rules and regulations are complied with.

§ 506.
Charitable exemptions.

The provisions of sections 503-505 of this title shall not apply to dance halls, bowling alleys, or pool halls operated by charitable, educational, and fraternal organizations or institutions on premises owned or regularly occupied by charitable, educational, and fraternal organizations or institutions except that in any event no license fee shall be required from any of the organizations or institutions mentioned in this section.

§ 507.
Construction.

The provisions of sections 503-506 of this title shall not apply to cities or incorporated villages whose charters, ordinances, or bylaws make different provisions as to the licenses or any of them provided for in this chapter.

§ 508.
Penalties.

A person, partnership, association, or corporation who violates a provision of sections 501-507 of this title or who violates any lawful rule or regulation made as provided in section 505 of this title shall be fined not more than $100.00 nor less than $25.00 for each such violation.
Each such violation occurring at any single dance shall be deemed to be a separate offense.

§ 509.
Setting up alley near schoolhouse or church.

A person as owner or keeper, who sets up or uses a bowling alley upon land adjoining the land on which a school building, college, academy, or church is located, shall be fined $20.00 for each day or time he or she permits such alley to be used.

§ 510.
Repealed.
1959, No. 262, § 37, eff. June 11, 1959.

§ 511.
Coasting on sleds.

The selectboard shall forbid coasting upon the highways when it endangers the lives or property of travelers and shall post notices to that effect in two or more conspicuous places in the vicinity.
However, such prohibition shall not apply to highways in villages or cities having regulations respecting coasting.

§ 512.
Penalties.

A person who thereafter coasts on a highway specified in such notice shall be fined $2.00.